Florida, session 2026, HB703.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
59
60 Section 1. Section 723.005, Florida Statutes, is amended
61 to read:
62 723.005 Regulation by division.—Except as provided in this
63 chapter, the division has the power and duty to enforce and
64 ensure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules
65 promulgated pursuant hereto relating to the rental, development,
66 and sale of mobile home parks. However, the division does not
67 have the power or duty to enforce mobile home park rules and
68 regulations or to enforce the provisions of ss. 723.022,
69 723.023, and 723.033.
70 Section 2. Section 723.022, Florida Statutes, is amended
71 to read:
72 723.022 Mobile home park owner's general obligations.—
73 (1) A mobile home park owner shall at all times:
74 (a)(1) Comply with the requirements of applicable
75 building, housing, and health codes.
Page 3 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
76 (b)(2) Maintain buildings and improvements in common areas
77 in a good state of repair and maintenance and maintain the
78 common areas in a good state of appearance, safety, and
79 cleanliness.
80 (c)(3) Provide access to the common areas, including
81 buildings and improvements thereto, at all reasonable times for
82 the benefit of the park residents and their guests.
83 (d)(4) Maintain utility connections and systems for which
84 the park owner is responsible in proper operating condition.
85 (e)(5) Comply with properly promulgated park rules and
86 regulations and require other persons on the premises with his
87 or her consent to comply therewith and conduct themselves in a
88 manner that does not unreasonably disturb the park residents or
89 constitute a breach of the peace.
90 (2) A person who is injured by a violation of this section
91 may file a complaint with the Department of Legal Affairs. The
92 Department of Legal Affairs has the authority to enforce
93 compliance with this section. The Department of Legal Affairs
94 may adopt rules to implement this subsection.
95 Section 3. Section 723.023, Florida Statutes, is amended
96 to read:
97 723.023 Mobile home owner's general obligations.—
98 (1) A mobile home owner shall:
99 (a)(1) At all times comply with all obligations imposed on
100 mobile home owners by applicable provisions of building,
Page 4 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
101 housing, and health codes, including compliance with all
102 building permits and construction requirements for construction
103 on the mobile home and lot. The home owner is responsible for
104 all fines imposed by the local government for noncompliance with
105 any local codes.
106 (b)(2) At all times keep the mobile home lot that he or
107 she occupies clean, neat, and sanitary, and maintained in
108 compliance with all local codes.
109 (c)(3) At all times comply with properly promulgated park
110 rules and regulations and require other persons on the premises
111 with his or her consent to comply with such rules and to conduct
112 themselves, and other persons on the premises with his or her
113 consent, in a manner that does not unreasonably disturb other
114 residents of the park or constitute a breach of the peace.
115 (d)(4) Receive written approval from the mobile home park
116 owner before making any exterior modification or addition to the
117 home.
118 (e)(5) When vacating the premises, remove any debris and
119 other property of any kind which is left on the mobile home lot.
120 (2) A person who is injured by a violation of this section
121 may file a complaint with the Department of Legal Affairs. The
122 Department of Legal Affairs has the authority to enforce
123 compliance with this section. The Department of Legal Affairs
124 may adopt rules to implement this subsection.
125 Section 4. Subsection (6) of section 723.033, Florida
Page 5 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
126 Statutes, is amended to read:
127 723.033 Unreasonable lot rental agreements; increases,
128 changes.—
129 (6) In determining whether a rent increase or resulting
130 lot rental amount is unreasonable, the court may consider
131 economic or other factors, including, but not limited to, all of
132 the following:
133 (a) The number of active sales within the mobile home park
134 at the time the notice of rent increase is issued.
135 (b) Incentives and other discounts being offered to new
136 purchasers by the mobile home park owner or the mobile home
137 owner.
138 (c) The number of mobile homes abandoned or the number of
139 titles transferred by the mobile home owner to the mobile home
140 park owner in the previous 12 months for the purpose of avoiding
141 eviction or to otherwise not terminate an existing rental
142 agreement.
143 (d) Increases or decreases in the consumer price index,
144 published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the Department of
145 Labor.;
146 (e) Increases or decreases in operating costs or taxes.;
147 and
148 (f) Prior disclosures.
149 Section 5. Section 723.034, Florida Statutes, is created
150 to read:
Page 6 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
151 723.034 Requirements for electronic billing or payment
152 systems.—
153 (1) A mobile home park owner may not engage, or permit an
154 employee or agent of the park owner to engage, in any of the
155 following acts or practices:
156 (a) Requiring a mobile home owner to use an electronic
157 billing or payment system as the only method to pay the lot
158 rental amount or user fees.
159 (b) Assessing a fee or other charge to a mobile home owner
160 for his or her refusal or inability to pay the lot rental amount
161 or user fees through an electronic billing or payment system
162 used by the mobile home park owner.
163 (c) Using an electronic billing or payment system that
164 requires a mobile home owner to waive individual or collective
165 rights or remedies otherwise provided by law.
166 (d) Using an electronic billing or payment system that
167 collects, or requires access to, a mobile home owner's personal
168 data or data that is stored on a mobile home owner's device
169 beyond which is necessary to make a payment for the lot rental
170 amount or user fees.
171 (2) This section applies prospectively and retroactively
172 to all lot rental agreements existing on July 1, 2026.
173 (3) A person who is injured by a violation of this section
174 may file a complaint with the Department of Legal Affairs. The
175 Department of Legal Affairs has the authority to enforce
Page 7 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
176 compliance with this section. The Department of Legal Affairs
177 may adopt rules to implement this subsection.
178 Section 6. Subsection (2), paragraph (b) of subsection
179 (4), and subsection (6) of section 723.037, Florida Statutes,
180 are amended to read:
181 723.037 Lot rental increases; reduction in services or
182 utilities; change in rules and regulations; mediation.—
183 (2) Notice as required by this section shall, in addition
184 to the information required in subsection (1), must only be
185 required to include the dollar amount of the relevant portions
186 of the present lot rental amount that are being increased and
187 the dollar amount of the proposed increases in lot rental amount
188 if there is an increase in the lot rental amount, the reduction
189 in services or utilities, or the change in rules and regulations
190 and the effective date thereof. If there is a proposed increase
191 in the lot rental amount, all relevant invoices, evidence, or
192 proof that shows the expenses or material factors causing the
193 increase in the lot rental amount must be included in such
194 notice.
195 (4)
196 (b)1. At the meeting, the park owner or subdivision
197 developer shall in good faith disclose and explain all expenses
198 or material factors, including all relevant invoices, evidence,
199 or other proof, resulting in the decision to increase the lot
200 rental amount, reduce services or utilities, or change rules and
Page 8 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
201 regulations, including how those factors justify the specific
202 change proposed. The park owner or subdivision developer may not
203 limit the discussion of the reasons for the change to
204 generalities only, such as, but not limited to, increases in
205 operational costs, changes in economic conditions, or rents
206 charged by comparable mobile home parks. For example,
207 2. If the reason for an increase in lot rental amount is
208 an increase in operational costs, the park owner must disclose
209 and provide evidence of the item or items which have increased,
210 the amount of the increase, any similar item or items which have
211 decreased, and the amount of the decrease.
212 3. If an amenity, a service, or a utility is no longer
213 available to mobile home owners, the park owner must reduce
214 their lot rental amount.
215 4. If an increase is based upon the lot rental amount
216 charged by comparable mobile home parks, the park owner shall
217 disclose, and provide in writing to the committee at or before
218 the meeting, the name, address, lot rental amount, and any other
219 relevant factors relied upon by the park owner, such as
220 facilities, services, and amenities, concerning the comparable
221 mobile home parks. The information concerning comparable mobile
222 home parks to be exchanged by the parties is to encourage a
223 dialogue concerning the reasons used by the park owner for the
224 increase in lot rental amount and to encourage the home owners
225 to evaluate and discuss the reasons for those changes with the
Page 9 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
226 park owner. The park owner shall prepare a written summary of
227 the material factors and retain a copy for 3 years. The park
228 owner shall provide the committee a copy of the summary at or
229 before the meeting.
230 2. The park owner shall not limit the comparable mobile
231 home park disclosure to those mobile home parks that are owned
232 or operated by the same owner or operator as the subject park,
233 except in certain circumstances, which include, but are not
234 limited to:
235 a. That the market area for comparable mobile home parks
236 includes mobile home parks owned or operated by the same entity
237 that have similar facilities, services, and amenities;
238 b. That the subject mobile home park has unique attributes
239 that are shared with similar mobile home parks;
240 c. That the mobile home park is located in a geographic or
241 market area that contains few comparable mobile home parks; or
242 d. That there are similar considerations or factors that
243 would be considered in such a market analysis by a competent
244 professional and would be considered in determining the
245 valuation of the market rent.
246 5. The park owner shall prepare a written summary of the
247 expenses and material factors required in this paragraph and
248 retain a copy for 3 years. The park owner shall provide the
249 committee a copy of the summary at or before the meeting.
250
Page 10 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
251 This subsection is not intended to be enforced by civil or
252 administrative action. Rather, the meetings and discussions are
253 intended to be in the nature of settlement discussions prior to
254 the parties proceeding to mediation of any dispute.
255 (6) If a party requests mediation and the opposing party
256 refuses to agree to mediate upon proper request, the party
257 refusing to mediate is shall not be entitled to attorney
258 attorney's fees in any action relating to a dispute described in
259 this section. Notwithstanding subsections (4) and (5), a person
260 may file a complaint with the Department of Legal Affairs if the
261 park owner fails to provide relevant invoices, evidence, or
262 proof of the expenses or material factors causing a proposed
263 increase in the lot rental amount. The Department of Legal
264 Affairs has the authority to enforce compliance with this
265 section. The Department of Legal Affairs may adopt rules to
266 implement this subsection.
267 Section 7. Subsection (4) of section 723.038, Florida
268 Statutes, is amended to read:
269 723.038 Dispute settlement; mediation.—
270 (4)(a) After the date of the last scheduled meeting held
271 pursuant to s. 723.037(4), the parties to a dispute may agree to
272 immediately select a mediator and initiate mediation proceedings
273 pursuant to this section. The parties may accept the mediator
274 appointed by the division or, within 30 days, select a mediator
275 to mediate the dispute pursuant to subsection (2).
Page 11 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
276 (b) The parties shall each pay a $250 filing fee to the
277 mediator appointed by the division or selected by the parties
278 within 30 days after the division notifies the parties of the
279 appointment of the mediator. The $250 filing fee shall be used
280 by the mediator to defray the hourly rate charged for mediation
281 of the dispute. Any portion of the filing fee not used shall be
282 refunded to the parties.
283 (c) If a party to the dispute refuses to mediate, the
284 other party may file a complaint with the Department of Legal
285 Affairs. Within 10 business days after receipt of the complaint,
286 the Department of Legal Affairs must appoint a mediator and
287 mediation must begin in accordance with this section.
288 Section 8. Paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (1)
289 of section 723.061, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
290 723.061 Eviction; grounds, proceedings.—
291 (1) A mobile home park owner may evict a mobile home
292 owner, a mobile home tenant, a mobile home occupant, or a mobile
293 home only on one or more of the following grounds:
294 (a) Nonpayment of the lot rental amount. If a mobile home
295 owner, or tenant, or occupant, whoever whichever is responsible,
296 fails to pay the lot rental amount when due and such failure to
297 pay is not caused, directly or indirectly, by the park owner's
298 refusal to accept payment for the lot rental amount or because
299 the park owner has restricted the ability of the mobile home
300 owner, tenant, or occupant to pay the lot rental amount when
Page 12 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
301 due, and if the default continues for 10 5 days after delivery
302 of a written demand by the mobile home park owner for payment of
303 the lot rental amount, the park owner may terminate the tenancy.
304 The mobile home owner, tenant, or occupant; a family member or
305 friend of the mobile home owner, tenant, or occupant; or any
306 other person, organization, or charity may pay the lot rental
307 amount by check or an electronic transfer, and such payment must
308 be accepted by the park owner, operator of the mobile home park,
309 or other designee of the park owner. If payment is made by
310 check, the amount due is considered paid at the time the check
311 is delivered to the park owner, operator of the mobile home
312 park, or other designee of the park owner. However, if the
313 mobile home owner, or tenant, or occupant; a family member or
314 friend of the mobile home owner, tenant, or occupant; or any
315 other person, organization, or charity whichever is responsible,
316 pays the lot rental amount due, including any late charges,
317 court costs, and attorney attorney's fees, the court may, for
318 good cause, deny the order of eviction, if such nonpayment has
319 not occurred more than twice.
320 (b) Conviction of a violation of a federal or state law or
321 local ordinance, if the violation is detrimental to the health,
322 safety, or welfare of other residents of the mobile home park.
323 The mobile home owner, or mobile home tenant, or mobile home
324 occupant must vacate the premises within 7 days after the date
325 the notice to vacate is delivered. This paragraph constitutes
Page 13 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
326 grounds to deny an initial tenancy of a purchaser of a home
327 under paragraph (e) or to evict an unapproved occupant of a
328 home.
329 (c) Violation of a park rule or regulation, the rental
330 agreement, or this chapter.
331 1. For the first violation of any properly promulgated
332 rule or regulation, rental agreement provision, or this chapter
333 which is found by any court of competent jurisdiction to have
334 been an act that endangered the life, health, safety, or
335 property of the park residents or employees or the peaceful
336 enjoyment of the mobile home park by its residents, the mobile
337 home park owner may terminate the rental agreement, and the
338 mobile home owner, tenant, or occupant must vacate the premises
339 within 7 days after the notice to vacate is delivered.
340 2. For a second violation of the same properly promulgated
341 rule or regulation, rental agreement provision, or this chapter
342 within 12 months, the mobile home park owner may terminate the
343 tenancy if she or he has given the mobile home owner, tenant, or
344 occupant written notice, within 30 days after the first
345 violation, which specified the actions of the mobile home owner,
346 tenant, or occupant that caused the violation and gave the
347 mobile home owner, tenant, or occupant 7 days to correct the
348 noncompliance. The mobile home owner, tenant, or occupant must
349 have received written notice of the ground upon which she or he
350 is to be evicted at least 30 days before prior to the date on
Page 14 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
351 which she or he is required to vacate. A second violation of a
352 properly promulgated rule or regulation, rental agreement
353 provision, or this chapter within 12 months after of the first
354 violation is unequivocally a ground for eviction, and it is not
355 a defense to any eviction proceeding that a violation has been
356 cured after the second violation. Violation of a rule or
357 regulation, rental agreement provision, or this chapter more
358 than 1 year after the first violation of the same rule or
359 regulation, rental agreement provision, or this chapter does not
360 constitute a ground for eviction under this section.
361
362 A properly promulgated rule or regulation may not be arbitrarily
363 applied and used as a ground for eviction or used as a basis for
364 a mobile home park owner to refuse to accept the payment of the
365 lot rental amount by any means, other than cash, or to otherwise
366 restrict the ability of a mobile home owner, a tenant, or an
367 occupant to pay the lot rental amount when due.
368 Section 9. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
369 723.0611, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
370 723.0611 Florida Mobile Home Relocation Corporation.—
371 (1)(a) There is created the Florida Mobile Home Relocation
372 Corporation to address voluntary closures of mobile home parks
373 due to a change in the use of the land comprising the mobile
374 home park. The corporation shall be administered by a board of
375 directors made up of six members, three of whom shall be
Page 15 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
376 appointed by the Secretary of Business and Professional
377 Regulation from a list of nominees submitted by the largest
378 nonprofit association representing mobile home owners in this
379 state, and three of whom shall be appointed by the Secretary of
380 Business and Professional Regulation from a list of nominees
381 submitted by the largest nonprofit association representing the
382 manufactured housing industry in this state. All members of the
383 board of directors, including the chair, shall be appointed to
384 serve for staggered 3-year terms.
385 Section 10. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) and
386 subsections (4) and (7) of section 723.0612, Florida Statutes,
387 are amended to read:
388 723.0612 Change in use; relocation expenses; payments by
389 park owner.—
390 (1) If a mobile home owner is required to move due to a
391 change in use of the land comprising the mobile home park as set
392 forth in s. 723.061(1)(d) and complies with the requirements of
393 this section, the mobile home owner is entitled to payment from
394 the Florida Mobile Home Relocation Corporation of:
395 (b) The amount of $6,500 $3,000 for a single-section
396 mobile home or $11,500 $6,000 for a multisection mobile home,
397 whichever is less. Moving expenses include the cost of taking
398 down, moving, and setting up the mobile home in a new location.
399 (4) The Florida Mobile Home Relocation Corporation must
400 approve payment within 45 days after receipt of the information
Page 16 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
401 set forth in subsection (3), or payment is deemed approved. A
402 copy of the approval must be forwarded to the park owner with an
403 invoice for payment. Upon approval, the corporation shall issue
404 a voucher in the amount of the contract price for relocating the
405 mobile home. The moving contractor may redeem the voucher within
406 2 years after the date of issuance from the corporation
407 following completion of the relocation and upon approval of the
408 relocation by the mobile home owner.
409 (7) In lieu of collecting payment from the Florida Mobile
410 Home Relocation Corporation as set forth in subsection (1), a
411 mobile home owner may abandon the mobile home in the mobile home
412 park and collect $5,000 $1,375 for a single section and $7,000
413 $2,750 for a multisection from the corporation as long as the
414 mobile home owner delivers to the park owner the current title
415 to the mobile home duly endorsed by the owner of record and
416 valid releases of all liens shown on the title. If a mobile home
417 owner chooses this option, the park owner must pay shall make
418 payment to the corporation $1,375 for a single section mobile
419 home and $2,750 for a multisection mobile home in an amount
420 equal to the amount the mobile home owner is entitled to under
421 this subsection. The mobile home owner's application for funds
422 under this subsection requires shall require the submission of a
423 document signed by the park owner stating that the home has been
424 abandoned under this subsection and that the park owner agrees
425 to make payment to the corporation in the amount provided herein
Page 17 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
426 to the home owner under this subsection. However, in the event
427 that the required documents are not submitted with the
428 application, the corporation may consider the facts and
429 circumstances surrounding the abandonment of the home to
430 determine whether the mobile home owner is entitled to payment
431 under pursuant to this subsection. The mobile home owner is not
432 entitled to any compensation under this subsection if there is a
433 pending eviction action for nonpayment of lot rental amount
434 pursuant to s. 723.061(1)(a) which was filed against him or her
435 before prior to the mailing date of the notice of change in the
436 use of the mobile home park given pursuant to s. 723.061(1)(d).
437 Section 11. Paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of section
438 723.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
439 723.011 Disclosure prior to rental of a mobile home lot;
440 prospectus, filing, approval.—
441 (6)
442 (b) If a park owner violates this section and a lessee
443 suffers a substantial loss or damage to the lessee's mobile home
444 or personal property as a result of flooding, the lessee may
445 terminate the rental agreement by giving a written notice of
446 termination to the park owner no later than 30 days after the
447 date of the damage or loss. Termination of a rental agreement
448 under this section is effective when the requirements of s.
449 723.023(1)(e) s. 723.023(5) are met. For the purpose of this
450 paragraph, the term "substantial loss or damage" means the total
Page 18 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 703 2026
451 cost of repairs to or replacement of the mobile home and
452 personal property is 50 percent or more of the mobile home and
453 personal property's market value on the date the flooding
454 occurred.
455 Section 12. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 19 of 19
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb703-00